District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “On-Premises and On-Site Extended Hours Program Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 25-723 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
“(g)(1) Except as provided in § 25-724, for a licensee operating under an on-premises
retailer’s license, manufacturer’s license holding an on-site sales and consumption permit, or a
temporary license, the Board may extend the hours of sales, service, and consumption of
alcoholic beverages until 4:00 a.m., and the hours of operation to 24 hours a day, for cultural
events, sporting events, or tourism-related events, if the licensee:
“(A) Registers with the Board;
“(B) Pays a minimum registration fee of $100; and
“(C) Provides written notice no later than 3 calendar days before the first
day of the cultural event, sporting event, or tourism-related event to the Board of its extended
hours of operation, sales, service, and consumption.
“(2) The Board shall provide written notification to the Metropolitan Police
Department at least 48 hours before extended hours of operation, sales, service, and consumption
under this subsection will take effect. The written notification shall include the list of
establishments eligible to participate in the extended hours under this subsection.
“(3) To the extent feasible, the Board shall provide notice of extended hours of
operation, sales, service, and consumption pursuant to this subsection in the District of Columbia
Register, and shall, within 24 hours of that publication, post notice of these extended hours on
ABCA’s website.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) The fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the
Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration Fund established by § 25-210.
“(5) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “Cultural event” means an event or gathering that aims to highlight
the customs, arts, music, dances, or cuisines of various cultures through performances and
displays of artistic expression.
“(B) “Sporting event” means a professional or amateur event involving a
game or athletic competition that occurs either once annually or every 4 years that is organized
by a league or association.
“(C) “Tourism-related event” means an event, such as a major festival,
convention, or trade show, with the potential to attract visitors from outside a 50-mile radius of
the District, and that is likely to produce a significant positive financial impact for the District.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2